backup/apertium-mal-eng.mal.dix
  <!-- ഞാന്‍; ; 16 -->
<pardef n="/ഞാന്‍__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>ഞാന്‍</l>     <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞാ</l>        <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam_empty"/><par n="clitics_aayirunnu"/><par n="clitics_yodappam"/><par n="clitics_o"/><par n="clitics_um"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>എന്നെ</l>     <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam"/><par n="clitics_aayirunnu"/><par n="clitics_yodappam"/><par n="clitics_o"/><par n="clitics_um"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>എന്റെ</l>     <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam"/><par n="clitics_aayirunnu"/><par n="clitics_yodappam"/><par n="clitics_o"/><par n="clitics_um"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>എനിക്ക്</l>   <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>എനി</l>       <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>എന്നില്‍</l>  <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>എന്നി</l>     <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞാനാല്‍</l>   <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞാനാ</l>      <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam_empty"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞാനേ</l>      <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>എന്നൊട്</l>   <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>എന്നൊ</l>     <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="soc"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങള്‍</l>   <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങ</l>      <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളെ</l>    <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളുടെ</l>  <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങള്‍ക്</l> <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങള്‍</l>   <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam_empty"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളില്‍</l> <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളി</l>    <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam_empty"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളാല്‍</l> <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളാ</l>    <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam_empty"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളേ</l>    <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളോട്</l>  <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളോ</l>    <r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="soc"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam_empty"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="അവന/്‍__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>്‍</l>        <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>െ</l>         <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>്റെ</l>       <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>്</l>         <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ാല്‍</l>      <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>േ</l>         <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ോട്</l>       <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="അവള/്‍__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>്‍</l>        <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>െ</l>         <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ുടെ</l>       <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>്‍ക്</l>      <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ാല്‍</l>      <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>േ</l>         <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ോട്</l>       <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="അവര/്‍__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>്‍</l>        <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>െ</l>         <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ുടെ</l>       <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>്‍ക്ക്</l>    <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ാല്‍</l>      <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>േ</l>         <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ോട്</l>       <r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="അവള്‍__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ഒന്ന്__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->
  <!-- -->
<pardef n="മര/ം__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p><par n="clitics_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p><par n="clitics_o"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ം</l>         <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam_empty"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ത്തെ</l>      <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ത്തിന്റെ</l>  <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ത്തിന്</l>    <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ത്തില്‍</l>   <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ത്തി</l>      <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p><par n="clitics_loode"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ത്തി</l>      <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ത്താല്‍</l>   <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>മേ</l>        <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ത്തൊടു</l>    <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ങ്ങള്‍</l>    <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ങ്ങളെ</l>     <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ങ്ങളുടെ</l>   <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ങ്ങള്‍ക്</l>  <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ങ്ങളില്‍</l>  <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ങ്ങളാല്‍</l>  <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ങ്ങളേ</l>     <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ങ്ങളോടു</l>   <r>ം<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ഉത്തരം">          <i>ഉത്തര</i><par n="മര/ം__n"/></e>
<e lm="ഒന്ന്">           <i>ഒന്ന്</i><par n="ഒന്ന്__n"/></e>
<e lm="ചോദ്യം">          <i>ചോദ്യ</i><par n="മര/ം__n"/></e>
<e lm="പൂന്തോട്ടം">      <i>പൂന്തോട്ട</i><par n="മര/ം__n"/></e>
<e lm="മരം">             <i>മര</i><par n="മര/ം__n"/></e>
<e lm="മൃഗം">            <i>മൃഗ</i><par n="മര/ം__n"/></e>
<e lm="വനം">             <i>വന</i><par n="മര/ം__n"/></e>
<e lm="വെള്ള">           <i>വെള്ള</i><par n="മര/ം__n"/></e>
<e lm="വൈകുന്നേര">       <i>വൈകുന്നേരം</i><par n="മര/ം__n"/></e>
<e lm="ശബ്ദം">           <i>ശബ്ദ</i><par n="മര/ം__n"/></e>
<e lm="സമയ">             <i>സമയ</i><par n="മര/ം__n"/></e>
<e lm="ഞാന്‍">           <i></i><par n="/ഞാന്‍__prn"/></e>
<e lm="അവന്‍">           <i>അവന</i><par n="അവന/്‍__prn"/></e>
<e lm="അവര്‍">           <i>അവര</i><par n="അവര/്‍__prn"/></e>
<e lm="അവള്‍">           <i>അവള</i><par n="അവള/്‍__prn"/></e>
<e lm="ഇഷ്ടം">           <i>ഇഷ്ട</i><par n="മര/ം__n"/></e>
<e lm="ജനം">             <i>ജന</i><par n="മര/ം__n"/></e>
